California, session 20252026, AB1359.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 204 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:204. (a) No eligible person shall be exempt from service as a trial juror by reason of occupation, economic status, or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code, or for any other reason. No person shall be excused from service as a trial juror except as specified in subdivisions (b) and (c).(b) An eligible person may be excused from jury service only for undue hardship, upon themselves or upon the public, as defined by the Judicial Council.(c) (1) An eligible person 80 years of age or older may seek a permanent excuse from jury service without a supporting letter, memorandum, or note from a treating health care provider.(2) A person 80 years of age or older who seeks a permanent excuse from jury service pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be permanently excused from jury service. The Judicial Council may adopt or amend a rule of court and publish related judicial forms as necessary to implement this subdivision.(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.